North Dakota, session 69, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 15-19-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. A center for distance education student's school district of residence shall paymay
charge fees for a course, as may be prescribed by the superintendent of public
instruction, which must be paid by the student's:
a. Parent or legal guardian; or
b. School district of residence, if the school does not offer the course:
(1) That semester; or
(2) At a time the student has availability in the student's preferred class
schedule.
Page No. 1 25.0863.01000